Hawaii statutes.
[§431:2-201.8] Sales to members of
the armed forces. Pursuant to the Military Personnel Financial Services
Protection Act, Pub. L. No. 109-290, the commissioner shall have the authority
to adopt rules to protect service members of the United States armed forces
from dishonest and predatory life insurance sales practices by declaring
certain life insurance practices, identified in the rules, to be false, misleading,
deceptive, or unfair. [L 2007, c 233, §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next